Illinois, session 104th, SB2587.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $27,376,700, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education 7Assistance Fund to the Board of Trustees of Governors State 8University to meet its operational expenses for the fiscal 9year ending June 30, 2026. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112025.